Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1574
Actions and proceedings; how treated.

No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2025, or which could have been commenced prior to that date, by or against the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Environment and Energy, or any director or any employee thereof in such director's or employee's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of his or her official duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer of duties and functions from the Department of Natural Resources to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or the Chief Water Officer or the renaming of the Department of Environment and Energy as the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 2025, LB317, § 4.